Illinois, session 104th, SB2562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $14,861,800, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Guardianship and Advocacy Commission for 8operational expenses of the fiscal year ending June 30, 20269At the approximate amounts below:10  For Personal Services............................13,711,90011  For State Contributions to Social Security........1,049,90012  For Operational Expenses............................100,000 13    Section 5. The sum of $2,997,900, or so much thereof as may 14be necessary, is appropriated from the Guardianship and 15Advocacy Fund to the Guardianship and Advocacy Commission for 16services pursuant to Section 5 of the Guardianship and 17Advocacy Act. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192025.